Illinois, session 104th, SB228.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-80 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-80 new)7    Sec. 10-80. Diaper allowance.8    (a) Legislative intent. The General Assembly finds that:9        (1) According to the National Diaper Bank Network, one 10    out of every 2 families experience diaper insecurity. 11    Despite this growing need, there are limited government 12    programs available for families to access diapers.13        (2) A lack of diapers has significant physical, 14    financial, and emotional impacts on young children and 15    their caregivers.16        (3) In order for Illinois to be the best state in the 17    nation to raise a family, we must ensure caregivers are 18    able to access this basic need.19    (b) As used in this Section:20    "Eligible child" means any child who is 3 years of age or 21younger and whose primary residence is the State of Illinois.22    "WIC" means the federal Special Supplemental Nutrition 23Program for Women, Infants, and Children.   SB0228- 2 -LRB104 07178 KTG 17215 b1    (c) Diaper allowance program; application process. Subject 2to appropriation, the Department shall establish a diaper 3allowance program for eligible families with children 3 years 4of age or younger. The Department shall create an application 5process that requires applicants to submit an initial 6application for a diaper allowance and on an annual basis 7thereafter an application for a redetermination of 8eligibility. The Department shall maintain on its official 9website an online application system that permits an Illinois 10family to apply online for a diaper allowance or a 11redetermination of eligibility or to download a mail-in 12application form. Paper application forms shall be made 13available at WIC offices and at family community resource 14centers throughout the State. An application for a diaper 15allowance or a redetermination of eligibility must include all 16of the following information:17        (1) The name of each eligible child and the name of the 18    applicant who is primarily responsible for the welfare of 19    each identified child.20        (2) The address of the primary residence of each 21    eligible child and applicant.22        (3) The applicant's household income. Acceptable forms 23    of income verification shall include a copy of the 24    applicant's most recent W-2 form or copies of the 25    applicant's 2 most recent pay stubs. Other methods of 26    income verification may be accepted by the Department as   SB0228- 3 -LRB104 07178 KTG 17215 b1    prescribed by rule.2        (4) The applicant's written signature, if submitting a 3    paper application. The applicant's digital or electronic 4    signature, if submitting an online application.5    (d) Eligibility. A child is eligible for a diaper 6allowance in the amount of $70 per month if all of the 7following conditions are met:8        (1) the applicant's household income is at or below 9    100% of the federal poverty guidelines updated 10    periodically in the Federal Register by the U.S. 11    Department of Health and Human Services under the 12    authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2); and13        (2) the applicant is primarily responsible for the 14    child's welfare.15    An applicant may submit one application for all eligible 16children whose welfare the applicant is responsible for, and 17may receive a diaper allowance for each eligible child.18    Diaper allowance benefits shall not be considered income 19for purposes of determining eligibility or the amount of 20assistance for any other public aid benefit provided under 21State law.22    (e) Implementation.23        (1) The Department shall administer the diaper 24    allowance program through the Division of Family and 25    Community Services.26        (2) Diaper allowance benefits shall be distributed in   SB0228- 4 -LRB104 07178 KTG 17215 b1    the name of the applicant in a form and manner prescribed 2    by the Department. If possible, diaper allowance benefits 3    may be distributed electronically to the applicant by 4    means of an electronic benefits transfer card issued by 5    the Department.6        (3) The Department may adopt any additional rules 7    necessary to implement this Section.8    (f) Redetermination. In order to receive uninterrupted 9diaper allowance benefits, an applicant must file a 10redetermination application within 30 days before the 11expiration of the applicant's benefits. If any additional 12information is requested by the Department, the applicant must 13respond within 15 calendar days after the date the 14verification was requested in order to ensure there is no 15interruption of benefits.16    (g) Advisory committee. An advisory committee shall advise 17the Department concerning the implementation of the diaper 18allowance program. The advisory committee shall include:19        (1) the Secretary of Human Services, or the 20    Secretary's designee;21        (2) the Governor, or the Governor's designee;22        (3) one member appointed by the President of the 23    Senate;24        (4) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 25    of Representatives; and26        (5) three members appointed by the Governor as   SB0228- 5 -LRB104 07178 KTG 17215 b1    follows:2            (A) one member of a community-based organization 3        which currently distributes diapers to families;4            (B) one member of an organization with experience 5        providing access to diapers to families via a debit 6        card or other electronic issuance method; and7            (C) one caregiver who has been directly impacted 8        by a lack of diapers for his or her child.9    The advisory committee shall be staffed by the Department 10of Human Services. The advisory committee shall meet monthly 11starting on September 1, 2025 through July 1, 2027. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.